Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB199.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the State Emergency Supplemental Grant Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Disaster." An event that causes substantial damage in this Commonwealth, including a natural disaster, that requires a disaster declaration."Eligible item." An essential item that is covered under the program if damaged in a Federal disaster declaration or State 123456789101112131415161718 disaster declaration, including:(1) Housing.(2) Temporary rental assistance.(3) Personal property.(4) Medical or dental care.(5) Transportation.(6) Funeral costs.(7) Any other essential item."Eligible person." A person who:(1) If an individual, is a resident of this Commonwealth or, if an entity, has its principal place of business in this Commonwealth.(2) Experiences damage as the direct result of a disaster in this Commonwealth that received a disaster declaration.(3) For a Federal disaster declaration, has applied for a grant through the Federal agency and has received the maximum grant from the Federal agency's individual assistance grant programs."Federal agency." The Federal Emergency Management Agency."Federal disaster declaration." A federally declared disaster declaration granted by the President of the United States at the request of the Governor that indicates a disaster situation exists in this Commonwealth and allows for the implementation of individual assistance programs."Federally appraised loss." The assessed value of damage sustained from a disaster as determined by the Federal Government."Fund." The State Emergency Supplemental Assistance Fund established under section 6.20250HB0199PN0145 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Program." The State Emergency Supplemental Grant Program established under section 3."State agency." The Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency."State disaster." A declaration by the Governor of disaster emergency under 35 Pa.C.S. § 7301(c) (relating to general authority of Governor)."Supplemental grant." A grant award provided by the program through the State agency to an eligible person.Section 3. State Emergency Supplemental Grant Program.(a) Establishment.--The State Emergency Supplemental Grant Program is established within the State agency.(b) Administration.--The State agency shall administer the program for the purpose of providing supplemental grants to eligible persons who have:(1) for a Federal disaster declaration, received the maximum grant allowance from the Federal agency's programs; or(2) for a State disaster declaration, sustained loss of an eligible item.Section 4. Program guidelines.(a) Application.--The State agency shall coordinate with the Federal agency on a procedure that permits an application from an eligible person for assistance from the Federal agency to be automatically transmitted to the State agency for processing after the individual receives the maximum grant award from the Federal agency. The State agency shall:(1) Use information obtained from the Federal agency to award supplemental grants.(2) Follow the Federal agency's guidelines to determine 20250HB0199PN0145 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and administer supplemental grants under the program.(b) Use of supplemental grant money.--Supplemental grant money may only be used for eligible items and shall be spent on the eligible items for which the funding was specifically awarded.(c) Grant amounts.--(1) For a Federal disaster declaration, an eligible person may receive a supplemental grant equal to the difference between the grant amount received from the Federal agency and the federally appraised loss, provided that the supplemental grant award does not exceed $10,000.(2) For a State disaster declaration, an eligible person who is:(i) An individual may receive a supplemental grant not to exceed an amount determined by the State agency.(ii) An entity may receive a supplemental grant not to exceed an amount determined by the State agency.(3) In determining the amounts under paragraph (2), the State agency may consider the number of applications, the amount of loss of eligible items and the amount of available money in the fund.(d) Exclusions.--The following items shall not be covered under the program:(1) Home improvements, additions and upgrades on real or personal property.(2) Preexisting conditions on housing or personal property.(3) Landscaping.(4) Recreational real or personal property.(5) Debts or other financial obligations that a person 20250HB0199PN0145 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 incurred prior to the disaster.(6) Luxury, nonessential and decorative items.(7) Cash.(8) Other items determined by the State agency to be nonessential.Section 5. Repayment of grants.An eligible person may not be required to repay a supplemental grant unless the supplemental grant money was not spent according to the program guidelines or was obtained fraudulently. In such case, the total amount of the supplemental grant received shall be repaid to the State agency under such terms as specified by the State agency.Section 6. State Emergency Supplemental Assistance Fund.The State Emergency Supplemental Assistance Fund is established in the State Treasury. The money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the State agency for the purposes of supplemental grants under the program.Section 7. Funding.Beginning in fiscal year 2025-2026 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board shall transfer $5,000,000 to the fund.Section 8. Regulations.The State agency shall promulgate regulations necessary to administer this act.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB0199PN0145 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526